Hawaii, session 2026, HB2020.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 286-107, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e)  No driver's license shall be renewed by the examiner of drivers unless: (1)  The examiner of drivers is satisfied of the applicant's fitness to continue to operate a motor vehicle; (2)  The applicant completes an educational course that includes: (A)  An online road safety video developed by the department of transportation; and (B)  A written road safety examination that tests an applicant's: (i)  Ability to understand highway signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic; (ii)  Knowledge of the rules of the road based on the traffic laws of the State and the traffic ordinances of the county where the applicant resides or intends to operate a motor vehicle, including any changes in state traffic laws; and (iii)  Any other knowledge of the rules of the road that the department of transportation deems necessary to determine the applicant's fitness to continue to operate a motor vehicle; [(2)] (3)  The fee required by subsection (d) is tendered together with the application for renewal; [(3)] (4)  The applicant complies with section 286-102.5; and [(4)] (5)  The examiner of drivers is satisfied that the applicant does not have outstanding charges and fines relating to the disposition of an abandoned vehicle[.]; provided that paragraph (2) shall only apply if the person received a moving violation or traffic infraction in a period of five years before renewal." SECTION 2.  (a) The department of transportation may develop and implement a system to randomly require applicants for renewal of a driver's license to complete a written examination on traffic laws and road safety as a condition of renewal. (b)  The department of transportation shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, regarding the educational course requirements of section 1 of this Act and whether the department will implement a system pursuant to subsection (a) to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.